Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-104
Dower and curtesy, abolished.

The estates of dower and curtesy are hereby abolished.

Laws 1907, c. 49, § 4, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 1268;

C.S.1922, § 1223;

C.S.1929, § 30-104;

R.S.1943, § 30-104.

Surviving husband is heir of deceased wife as to personal property. In re Hanson's Estate, 118 Neb. 208, 224 N.W. 2 (1929).

Interest of wife in property of her husband is cut off by foreclosure against her husband without making her a party to foreclosure. Filley v. Dickinson, 110 Neb. 356, 193 N.W. 914 (1923).

If the widow made no claim for dower under former statute and dower was not assigned, she has no interests in property, which was sold during her lifetime, to convey by will. Dovey v. Schlater, 104 Neb. 108, 175 N.W. 888 (1919).

Husband and wife are placed upon exact equality as to the rights of each in the property of the other. Richardson v. Johnson, 97 Neb. 749, 151 N.W. 314 (1915).